Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-305
Fees; disposition.

The mail-order ophthalmic provider shall pay a fee equivalent to the annual fee for an initial or renewal permit to operate a pharmacy in Nebraska as established in and at the times provided for in the Health Care Facility Licensure Act. Such fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund.

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 90;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 12;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 295.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.